Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.656

[Art. 84] Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the organized militia of any person who is known to the person to be ineligible for that enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

[ 1989 c 48 s 62; 1963 c 220 s 83.]